District of Columbia statutes.
22-2717

Order of abatement; sale of property; entry of closed premises punishable as contempt.

If the existence of the nuisance be established in an action as provided in §§ 22-2713 to 22-2720, or in a criminal proceeding, an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case which order shall direct the removal from the building or place of all fixtures, furniture, musical instruments, or movable property used in conducting the nuisance, and shall direct the sale thereof in the manner provided for the sale of chattels under execution, and the effectual closing of the building or place against its use for any purpose, and so keeping it closed for a period of 1 year, unless sooner released. If any person shall break and enter or use a building, erection, or place so directed to be closed such person shall be punished as for contempt, as provided in § 22-2716.

History

Feb. 7, 1914, 38 Stat. 281, ch. 16, § 5
Oct. 15, 1970, 84 Stat. 931, Pub. L. 91-452, title II, § 257
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 14(b), 41 DCR 1639

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-2718.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-2717.
1973 Ed., § 22-2717.